California statutes. Civil Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 201.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.4.

“Retail buyer” or “buyer” means a person who buys goods or obtains services from a retail seller in a retail installment sale and not principally for the purpose of resale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 201.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.5.

“Retail installment sale” or “sale” means the sale of goods or the furnishing of services by a retail seller to a retail buyer for a deferred payment price payable in installments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 546.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.6.

“Retail installment contract” or “contract” means any contract for a retail installment sale between a buyer and seller, entered into or performed in this state, which provides for (a) repayment in installments, whether or not such contract contains a title retention provision, and in which the buyer agrees to pay a finance charge, or in which the buyer does not agree to pay a finance charge but the goods or services are available at a lesser price if paid for by either cash or credit card, or in which the buyer would have received any additional goods or services or any higher quality goods or services at no added cost over the total amount
 payable in installments if the sale had been for cash, or (b) which provides for payment in more than four installments. When taken or given in connection with a retail installment sale, the term includes but is not limited to a security agreement and a contract for the bailment or leasing of goods by which the bailee or lessee contracts to pay as compensation for their use a sum substantially equivalent to or in excess of their value and by which it is agreed that the bailee or lessee will become, or for no other or for a nominal consideration has the option of becoming, the owner of the goods upon full compliance with the terms of the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.7.

“Retail installment account” or “installment account” or “revolving account” means an account established by an agreement entered into in this state, pursuant to which the buyer promises to pay, in installments, to a retail seller, his outstanding balance incurred in retail installment sales, whether or not a security interest in the goods sold is retained by the seller, and which provides for a finance charge which is expressed as a percent of the periodic balances to accrue thereafter providing such charge is not capitalized or stated as a dollar amount in such agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 546.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.8.

“Cash price” means the cash price stated in a retail installment contract for which the seller would sell or furnish to the buyer and the buyer would buy or obtain from the seller the goods or services which are the subject matter of a retail installment contract if the sale were a sale for cash instead of a retail installment sale. The cash price shall include any taxes and cash prices for accessories and services, if any, included in a retail installment sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1075, Sec. 2.   Operative October 1, 1982, or sooner, by Sec. 25 of Ch. 1075, as amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 129, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.9.

“Total sale price” means the total of the cash price of the goods or services, the amounts, if any, included for insurance, official fees, and the finance charge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1075, Sec. 3.   Operative October 1, 1982, or sooner, by Sec. 25 of Ch. 1075, as amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 129, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.10.

“Finance charge” means the amount however denominated or expressed which the retail buyer contracts to pay or pays for the privilege of purchasing goods or services to be paid for by the buyer in installments. “Finance charge” does not include the amounts, if any, charged for insurance premiums, including premiums of the kind and to the extent described in paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of Section 226.4 of Regulation Z, delinquency charges, attorney’s fees, court costs, collection expenses, official fees, extension or deferral agreement charges as provided by Section 1807.1, or amounts for insurance, repairs to or preservation of the goods, or
 preservation of the holder’s security interest therein advanced by the holder subsequent to the execution of a contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 199, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.11.

(a) “Amount financed” means the amount required to be disclosed pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (c) of Section 1803.3.

(b) “Unpaid balance” means the cash price of the goods or services which are the subject matter of the retail installment sale, plus the amounts, if any, included in a retail installment sale for insurance and official fees, minus the amount of the buyer’s downpayment in money or goods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1075, Sec. 4.   Operative October 1, 1982, or sooner, by Sec. 25 of Ch. 1075, as amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 129, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.12.

“Total of payments” means the amount required to be disclosed pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 226.18 of Regulation Z. The term includes any portion of the downpayment deferred until not later than the second otherwise scheduled payment and which is not subject to a finance charge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1075, Sec. 5.   Operative October 1, 1982, or sooner, by Sec. 25 of Ch. 1075, as amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 129, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.13.

“Holder” means the retail seller who acquires a retail installment contract or installment account executed, incurred or entered into by a retail buyer, or if the contract or installment account is purchased by a financing agency or other assignee, the financing agency or other assignee. The term does not include the pledgee of or the holder of a security interest in an aggregate number of such contracts or installment accounts to secure a bona fide loan thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 201.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.14.

“Official fees” means the fees required by law and actually to be paid to the appropriate public officer to perfect a lien or other security interest, on or in goods, retained or taken by a seller under a retail installment contract or installment account, and license, certificate of title, and registration fees imposed by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 546.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.15.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association or other group, however organized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.16.

“Financing agency” means a person engaged in this State in whole or in part in the business of purchasing retail installment contracts, or installment accounts from one or more retail sellers. The term includes but is not limited to a bank, trust company, private banker, or investment company, if so engaged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 201.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.17.

“Billing cycle” means the time interval between regular monthly billing statement dates.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 546.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.18.

“Regulation Z” means any rule, regulation, or interpretation promulgated by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (“Board”) under the Federal Truth in Lending Act, as amended (15 U.S.C. 1601, et seq.), and any interpretation or approval issued by an official or employee of the Federal Reserve System duly authorized by the board under the Truth in Lending Act, as amended, to issue such interpretations or approvals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.19.

(a) For the purposes of this chapter, a retail installment contract, contract, retail installment account, installment account, or revolving account shall be deemed to have been made in this state and, therefore, subject to the provisions of this chapter, if either the seller offers or agrees in this state to sell to a buyer who is a resident of this state or if such buyer accepts or makes the offer in this state to buy, regardless of the situs of the contract as specified therein.

(b) Any solicitation or communication to sell, oral or written, originating outside of this state, but
 forwarded to, and received in this state by, a buyer who is a resident of this state, shall be deemed to be an offer or agreement to sell in this state.

(c) Any solicitation or communication to buy, oral or written, originating within this state, from a buyer who is a resident of this state, but forwarded to, and received by, a retail seller outside of this state, shall be deemed to be an acceptance or offer to buy in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.20.

“Simple-interest basis” means the determination of a finance charge, other than an administrative finance charge, by applying a constant rate to the unpaid balance as it changes from time to time, either:

(a) Calculated on the basis of a 365-day year and actual days elapsed (although the seller may, but need not, adjust its calculations to account for leap years); reference in this chapter to the “365-day basis” shall mean this method of determining the finance charge, or

(b) For contracts entered into prior to January 1, 1988, calculated
 on the basis of a 360-day year consisting of 12 months of 30 days each and on the assumption that all payments will be received by the seller on their respective due dates; reference in this chapter to the “360-day basis” shall mean this method of determining the finance charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.21.

“Precomputed basis” means the determination of a finance charge by multiplying the original unpaid balance of the contract by a rate and multiplying that product by the number of payment periods elapsing between the date on which the finance charge begins to be assessed and the date of the last scheduled payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Provisions of Retail Installment Contracts [1803.1. - 1803.11.]

1803.1.

A retail installment contract shall be dated and in writing; the printed portion thereof shall be in at least eight-point type.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 201.)
-------------------------------------------

1803.2.

Except as provided in Section 1808.3, every retail installment contract shall be contained in a single document that shall contain:

(a) The entire agreement of the parties with respect to the cost and terms of payment for the goods and services, including any promissory notes or any other evidences of indebtedness between the parties relating to the transaction.

(b) (1) At the top of the contract the words
 “Security Agreement” shall appear in at least 12-point bold type where a security interest in the goods is retained or a security interest on other goods or realty is obtained by the seller as security for the goods or services purchased.

(2) At the top of the contract the words “Retail Installment Contract” shall appear in at least 12-point bold type where a security interest is not retained or obtained by the seller as security for the goods or services purchased.

(3) Any contract for goods or services that provides for a security interest in real property shall also provide the following notice, written in the same language, e.g., Spanish, as used in the contract: “WARNING TO BUYER: IF YOU SIGN THIS CONTRACT, YOU WILL BE PUTTING UP YOUR HOME AS SECURITY. THIS MEANS THAT YOUR HOME COULD BE SOLD WITHOUT YOUR PERMISSION AND WITHOUT ANY COURT ACTION IF YOU MISS ANY PAYMENT AS
 REQUIRED BY THIS CONTRACT.” This notice shall be printed in at least 14-point boldface type, shall be set apart from the rest of the contract by a border, and shall appear directly above the space reserved for the signature of the buyer. A security interest created in any contract described in this paragraph that does not provide the notice as required by this paragraph shall be void and unenforceable.

As used in this subdivision, the term “security interest” refers to a contractual interest in property and not to a mechanic’s lien or other interest in property arising by operation of law.

(c) Where the contract includes a finance charge that is determined on the precomputed basis and provides that the unearned portion of the finance charge to be refunded upon full prepayment of the contract is to be determined by a method other than actuarial, a notice in at least 10-point bold type if the contract is
 printed reading as follows: “Notice to buyer: (1) Do not sign this agreement before you read it or if it contains any blank spaces to be filled in. (2) You are entitled to a completely filled-in copy of this agreement. (3) You can prepay the full amount due under this agreement at any time and obtain a partial refund of the finance charge if it is $1 or more. Because of the way the amount of this refund will be figured, the time when you prepay could increase the ultimate cost of credit under this agreement. (4) If you desire to pay off in advance the full amount due, the amount of the refund you are entitled to, if any, will be furnished upon request.”

(d) Where the contract includes a finance charge that is determined on the precomputed basis and provides for the actuarial method for computing the unearned portion of the finance charge upon prepayment in full, a notice in at least 10-point bold type if the contract is printed reading as
 follows: “Notice to buyer: (1) Do not sign this agreement before you read it or if it contains any blank spaces to be filled in. (2) You are entitled to a completely filled-in copy of this agreement. (3) You can prepay the full amount due under this agreement at any time and obtain a partial refund of the finance charge if it is $1 or more. (4) If you desire to pay off in advance the full amount due, the amount of the refund you are entitled to, if any, will be furnished upon request.”

(e) Where the contract includes a finance charge that is determined on the simple-interest basis, a notice in at least 10-point bold type if the contract is printed reading as follows: “Notice to buyer: (1) Do not sign this agreement before you read it or if it contains any blank spaces to be filled in. (2) You are entitled to a completely filled-in copy of this agreement. (3) You can prepay the full amount due under this agreement at any time. (4) If you desire
 to pay off in advance the full amount due, the amount which is outstanding will be furnished upon request.”

(f) This section shall become operative on October 1, 1995.

(g) The form specified in this section may be used before October 1, 1995, to comply with the provisions of this section as amended and repealed by Section 2 of Chapter 888 of the Statutes of 1994.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 888, Sec. 3) by Stats. 1995, Ch. 153, Sec. 1.   Effective July 24, 1995.   Section operative October 1, 1995, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1803.3.

Except as provided in Article 8 (commencing with Section 1808.1) of this chapter, a contract shall contain the following:

(a) The names of the seller and the buyer, the place of business of the seller, the residence or place of business of the buyer as specified by the buyer and a description of the goods or services sufficient to identify them. Services or multiple items of goods may be described in general terms and may be described in detail sufficient to identify them in a separate writing.

(b) Every contract subject
 to this chapter shall contain the disclosures required by Regulation Z whether or not Regulation Z applies to the transaction. In addition, to the extent applicable, the contract shall contain the other disclosures and notices required by, and shall satisfy the requirements and limitations of, this section. The disclosures required by subdivision (c) may be itemized or subtotaled to a greater extent than as required by that subdivision and shall be made together and in the sequence set forth in that subdivision. No particular terminology is required to disclose the items set forth in subdivision (c) except as therein expressly provided. Except as otherwise provided by this subdivision (b), these disclosures and notices may appear in the contract in any location or sequence and may be combined or interspersed with other provisions of the contract.

(c) The contract shall contain the following disclosures, as applicable, which shall be labeled
 “itemization of the amount financed”:

(1) (A) The cash price, exclusive of taxes imposed on the sale.

(B) Taxes imposed on the sale.

(C) The total of the above.

(2) An itemization of the amount to be paid to any public officer for official fees.

(3) The aggregate amount of premiums agreed, upon execution of the contract, to be paid for policies of insurance included in the contract, excluding the amount of any insurance premium included in the finance charge.

(4) A subtotal representing the sum of the foregoing items.

(5) The amount of the
 buyer’s downpayment, which downpayment shall not include any administrative finance charge charged, received, or collected by the seller pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1805.1 and as shown as item (6), itemized to show the following:

(A) The net agreed value of the property being traded in.

(B) The amount of any portion of downpayment to be deferred until not later than the due date of the second regularly scheduled installment under the contract and which is not subject to a finance charge.

(C) The amount of any manufacturer’s rebate applied or to be applied to the downpayment.

(D) The remaining amount paid or to be paid by the buyer as a downpayment.

(6) The amount of any
 administrative finance charge, labeled “prepaid finance charge.”

(7) The difference between item (4) and the sum of items (5) and (6), labeled “amount financed.”

(d) If the payment of all or a portion of the downpayment is to be deferred, the deferred payment shall be reflected in the payment schedule disclosed pursuant to Regulation Z.

(e) If the downpayment includes property being traded in, the contract shall contain a brief description of that property.

(f) (1) Where the contract includes a finance charge determined on the precomputed basis, the contract shall identify the method of computing the unearned portion of the finance charge in the event of prepayment in full of the buyer’s obligation and contain a statement of the
 amount or method of computation of any charge that may be deducted from the amount of any such unearned finance charge in computing the amount that will be credited to the obligation or refunded to the buyer. Reference to the Rule of 78’s, the sum of the digits, the sum of the periodic time balances or the actuarial method shall constitute a sufficient identification of the method of computing the unearned portion of the finance charge. 

(2) Where the contract includes a finance charge which is determined on the simple-interest basis but provides for a minimum finance charge in the event of prepayment in full, the contract shall contain a statement of that fact and the amount of the minimum finance charge or its method of calculation.

(g) The contract shall contain an itemization of any insurance included as part of the amount financed disclosed pursuant to paragraph (3) of
 subdivision (c) and of any insurance included as part of the finance charge. The itemization shall identify the type of insurance coverage and the premium charged therefor, and, if the insurance expires before the date of the last scheduled installment included in the repayment schedule, the term of the insurance shall be stated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1075, Sec. 6.   Operative October 1, 1982, or sooner, by Sec. 25 of Ch. 1075, as amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 129, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

1803.4.

The seller shall not obtain the signature of the buyer to a contract when it contains blank spaces to be filled in after it has been signed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 201.)
-------------------------------------------

1803.5.

If the cost of any insurance is included in the contract and a separate charge is made to the buyer for such insurance:

(a) The contract shall state whether the insurance is to be procured by the buyer or the seller.

(b) The amount, included for such insurance, shall not exceed the premiums chargeable in accordance with rate fixed for such insurance by the insurer.

(c) If the insurance is to be procured by the seller or holder, he shall, within 45 days after delivery of the
 goods or furnishing of the services under the contract, deliver, mail or cause to be mailed to the buyer, at his address as specified in the contract, a notice thereof or a copy of the policy or policies of insurance or a certificate or certificates of the insurance so procured.

(d) The provisions of Insurance Code Section 1668 shall apply to any violation of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 201.)
-------------------------------------------

1803.6.

(a) A contract may provide that for each installment in default the buyer shall pay a delinquency charge not in excess of one of the following amounts:

(1) For a period in default of not less than 10 days, an amount not in excess of ten dollars ($10).

(2) For a period in default of not less than 15 days, an amount not in excess of fifteen dollars ($15).

(b) Only one delinquency charge may be collected on any installment regardless of the period during which it remains in default. Payments timely received by the seller under a written extension or deferral agreement shall not be subject to any delinquency charge. The contract may also provide for payment of any actual and reasonable costs of collection occasioned by removal of the goods from the state without written permission of the holder, or by the failure of the buyer to notify the holder of any change of residence, or by the failure of the buyer to communicate with the holder for a period of 45 days after any default in making payments due under the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 301, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1803.7.

The seller shall deliver to the buyer at the time of the buyer’s signature a legible copy of the contract or of any other document which the seller has required or requested the buyer to sign, and which he has signed, during the contract negotiation. In addition to the penalties provided under Article 12.2 (commencing with Section 1812.6) of this chapter, until the seller delivers such documents, the buyer shall be obligated to pay only the cash price. Any acknowledgment by the buyer of delivery of a copy of such documents shall be printed or written in a size equal to a least 10-point bold type and, if contained in the contract shall also appear directly above the
 space reserved for the buyer’s signature. The buyer’s written acknowledgment, conforming to the requirements of this section of delivery of a copy of such documents shall be a rebuttable presumption of such delivery and of compliance with this section and Section 1803.4, in any action or proceeding by or against an assignee of the contract without knowledge to the contrary when he purchases the contract.

If the holder furnishes the buyer a copy of such documents, or a notice containing the items required by Section 1803.3 and stating that the buyer should notify the holder in writing within 30 days if he was not furnished a copy of the contract or of any other document which the seller had required or requested the buyer to sign, and which he did sign, during the contract negotiation, and no such notification is given, it shall be conclusively presumed in favor of the third party that copies of such documents were furnished as required by Sections 1803. 4 and
 1803.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 546.)
-------------------------------------------

1803.8.

Retail installment sales negotiated and entered into by mail or telephone without personal solicitation by a salesman or other representative of the seller, where the seller’s cash and deferred payment prices and other terms are clearly set forth in a catalog or other printed solicitation of business which is generally available to the public, may be made as hereinafter provided. All of the provisions of this chapter shall apply to such sales except that the seller shall not be required to deliver a copy of the contract to the buyer as provided in Section 1803.7, and if, when the proposed retail installment sale contract is received by the seller from the buyer, there
 are blank spaces to be filled in, the seller may insert in the appropriate blank spaces the amounts of money and other terms which are set forth in the seller’s catalog which is then in effect. In lieu of the copy of the contract provided for in Section 1803.7 the seller shall, within 15 days from the date of shipment of goods, furnish to the buyer a written statement of the items inserted in such blank spaces.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 201.)
-------------------------------------------

1803.9.

If it is explicitly understood between the seller and the buyer that all or any part of the cash price will be paid from the proceeds of a loan to be obtained by the buyer from a third party, the contract of sale or purchase order may be rescinded at the election of the buyer, and all considerations thereupon shall be returned by the respective parties without further demand, if the buyer is unable to obtain such third-party financing upon reasonable terms after having made a reasonable effort to obtain it, and buyer notifies the seller of the rescission within three business days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1151.)
-------------------------------------------

1803.10.

It shall be unlawful for any seller to induce or attempt to induce any person to enter into a contract subject to this act by offering a rebate, discount, commission, or other consideration, contingent upon the happening of a future event, on the condition that the buyer either sells, or gives information or assistance for the purpose of leading to a sale by the seller of, the same or related goods.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 452.)
-------------------------------------------

1803.11.

It shall be unlawful for any seller to solicit buyers, in any advertisement, to enter into a retail installment contract with it if the seller does not intend to sell that retail installment contract to a financing agency or other assignee, unless the advertisement clearly states the periodic rate or range of periodic rates, expressed as an annual percentage rate or a range of annual percentage rates that will be used to determine the finance charge imposed on the retail installment contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Restrictions on Retail Installment Contracts [1804.1. - 1804.4.]

1804.1.

No contract or obligation shall contain any provision by which:

(a) The buyer agrees not to assert against a seller a claim or defense arising out of the sale or agrees not to assert against an assignee such a claim or defense other than as provided in Section 1804.2.

(b) In the absence of the buyer’s default in the performance of any of his or her obligations, the holder may accelerate the maturity of any part or all of the
 amount owing thereunder.

(c) A power of attorney is given to confess judgment in this state, or an assignment of wages is given; provided, that nothing herein contained shall prohibit the giving of an assignment of wages contained in a separate instrument, executed pursuant to Section 300 of the Labor Code.

(d) The seller or holder of the contract or other person acting on his or her behalf is given authority to enter upon the buyer’s premises unlawfully or to commit any breach of the peace in the repossession of goods.

(e) The buyer waives any right of action against the seller or holder of the contract or other person acting on his or her behalf, for any illegal act committed in the collection of payments under the contract or in the repossession of goods.

(f) The buyer executes a power of attorney appointing the seller or holder of the contract, or other person acting on his or her behalf, as the buyer’s agent in collection of payments under the contract or in the repossession of goods.

(g) The buyer relieves the seller from liability for any legal remedies which the buyer may have against the seller under the contract or any separate instrument executed in connection therewith.

(h) The buyer agrees to the payment of any charge by reason of the exercise of his or her right to rescind or void the contract.

(i) The seller or holder of the contract is given the right to commence an action on a contract under the provisions of this chapter in a county other than the county in which the contract was in fact signed by the buyer, the county in which the buyer
 resides at the commencement of the action, the county in which the buyer resided at the time that the contract was entered into, or in the county in which the goods purchased pursuant to the contract have been so affixed to real property as to become a part of such real property.

(j) The seller takes a security interest, other than a mechanics’ lien, in the buyer’s real property which is the buyer’s primary residence where the buyer is a person who is 65 years of age or older and the contract is for a home improvement, as defined in Section 7151.2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 512, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1804.2.

(a) An assignee of the seller’s rights is subject to all equities and defenses of the buyer against the seller arising out of the sale, notwithstanding an agreement to the contrary, but the assignee’s liability may not exceed the amount of the debt owing to the assignee at the time of the assignment.

(b) The assignee shall have recourse against the seller to the extent of any liability incurred by the assignee pursuant to this section regardless of whether the assignment was with or without recourse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 66.)
-------------------------------------------

1804.3.

(a) No contract other than one for services shall provide for a security interest in any goods theretofore fully paid for or which have not been sold by the seller.

(b) Any contract for goods which provides for a security interest in real property where the primary goods sold are not to be attached to the real property shall be a violation of this chapter and subject to the penalties set forth in Article 12.2 (commencing with Section 1812.6).

(c) This section shall become
 operative October 1, 1982.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 107, Sec. 4) by Stats. 1982, Ch. 129, Sec. 4.   Effective March 25, 1982.   Section operative October 1, 1982, by its own provisions, or sooner as prescribed by Sec. 13 of Ch. 129.)
-------------------------------------------

1804.4.

Any provision in a contract which is prohibited by this chapter shall be void but shall not otherwise affect the validity of the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 201.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Finance Charge Limitation [1805.1. - 1805.9.]

1805.1.

The holder of the contract shall not charge, collect, or receive a finance charge which exceeds the dollar amount shown pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1803.3, except to the extent (a) caused by the holder’s receipt of one or more payments under a contract which provides for determination of the finance charge or a portion thereof on the 365-day basis at a time or times other than as originally scheduled, whether or not the parties enter into an agreement pursuant to Section 1807.1, (b) permitted by paragraph (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 226.17 of Regulation Z, or (3) permitted by Section 1805.8.

No annual fee or charge shall be made in any retail installment contract.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 479, Sec. 1) by Stats. 1991, Ch. 819, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1805.2.

Contracts may be payable in successive monthly, semimonthly or weekly installments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 201.)
-------------------------------------------

1805.4.

The finance charge shall be inclusive of all charges incident to investigating and making the contract and for the extension of the credit provided for in the contract, and no fee, expense or other charge whatsoever shall be taken, received, reserved or contracted for except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

The seller or holder of a retail installment contract may charge and collect a fee not to exceed fifteen dollars ($15) for the return by a depository institution of a dishonored check, negotiable order of
 withdrawal, or share draft issued in connection with the retail installment contract. The fee is not included in charges as defined in this chapter or in determining the applicable charges which may be made under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 101, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1805.6.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of any contract to the contrary, except as provided in subdivision (b) or (c), no retail seller shall assess any finance charge for goods purchased under a retail installment contract until the goods are in the buyer’s possession.

(b) A finance charge may be assessed for such undelivered goods, as follows: 

(1) From the date when such goods are available for pickup by the buyer and the buyer is notified of their availability, or

(2) From the date of purchase, when such goods are delivered or available for pickup by the buyer within 10 days of the date of purchase.

(c) In the case of a home improvement contract as defined in Section 7151.2 of the Business and Professions Code, a finance charge may be assessed from the approximate date of commencement of the work as set forth in the home improvement contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1075, Sec. 8.   Operative October 1, 1982, or sooner, by Sec. 25 of Ch. 1075, as amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 129, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

1805.7.

All contracts entered into between a buyer and a seller on or after January 1, 1983, shall provide for the calculation of the finance charge contemplated by item (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1805.1 on the simple-interest basis if the date on which the final installment is due, according to the original terms of the contract, is more than 62 months after the date of the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------

1805.8.

The maximum rate of finance charge which may be imposed on amounts advanced by the holder subsequent to the execution of the contract for insurance, repairs to or preservation of the goods, or preservation of the holder’s security interest therein, shall not exceed the annual percentage rate disclosed pursuant to item (b) of Section 1803.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1075, Sec. 9.   Operative October 1, 1982, or sooner, by Sec. 25 of Ch. 1075, as amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 129, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

1805.9.

No contract shall provide for a finance charge which is determined in part by the precomputed basis and in part by the simple-interest basis, except for any finance charge permitted by Section 1805.8.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Payments [1806.1. - 1806.4.]

1806.1.

Unless the buyer has notice of actual or intended assignment of a contract or installment account, payment thereunder made by the buyer to the last known holder of such contract or installment account, shall to the extent of the payment, discharge the buyer’s obligation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 201.)
-------------------------------------------

1806.2.

At any time after its execution, but not later than one year after the last payment thereunder, the holder of a contract shall, upon written request of the buyer made in good faith, promptly give or forward to the buyer a detailed written statement which will state with accuracy the total amount, if any, unpaid thereunder. Such a statement shall be supplied by the holder once each year without charge; if any additional statement is requested by the buyer, the holder shall supply such statement to the buyer at a charge not exceeding one dollar ($1) for each additional statement supplied to the buyer. The provisions of this section shall apply only to those
 transactions wherein, instead of periodic statements of account, the buyer is provided with a passbook or payment book in which all payments, credits, charges and the unpaid balance is entered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 625.)
-------------------------------------------

1806.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of a contract to the contrary, the buyer may pay at any time before maturity the entire indebtedness evidenced by the contract without penalty. In the event of prepayment in full: 

(1) If the finance charge was determined on the precomputed basis, the amount required to repay the contract shall be the outstanding contract balance as of that date, provided, however, that the buyer shall be entitled to a refund credit in the amount of the unearned portion of the finance charge. The amount of the unearned portion of the finance
 charge shall be at least as great a proportion of the finance charge, or if the contract has been extended, deferred, or refinanced, of the additional charge therefor, as the sum of the periodic monthly time balances payable more than 15 days after the date of prepayment bears to the sum of all the periodic monthly time balances under the schedule of installments in the contract or, if the contract has been extended, deferred or refinanced, as so extended, deferred or refinanced. Where the amount of the refund credit is less than one dollar ($1), no refund credit need be made by the holder. Any refund credit in the amount of one dollar ($1) or more may be made in cash or credited to the outstanding obligations of the buyer under the contract. 

(2) If the finance charge or a portion thereof was determined on the simple-interest basis, the amount required to prepay the contract shall be the outstanding contract balance as of that date, including
 any earned finance charges which are unpaid as of that date, and provided further that in cases where the finance charge or a portion thereof is determined on the 360-day basis, the payments theretofore received will be assumed to have been received on their respective due dates regardless of the actual dates on which those payments were received. 
